Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.73
Misstatement concerning financial assistance; penalty.

Any person who fraudulently or willfully makes a misstatement of fact in connection with an application for financial assistance under the Emergency Management Act shall, upon conviction of each offense, be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1975, LB 612, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 48;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 860.